Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-548
Transportation of gas; operation of pipeline facilities; plan for inspection and maintenance; file with State Fire Marshal; adequacy of plan.

Each person who engages in the transportation of gas or who owns or operates pipeline facilities subject to sections 81-503, 81-505, 81-525, and 81-542 to 81-552 shall file with the State Fire Marshal a plan for inspection and maintenance of each such pipeline facility owned or operated by such person, and any changes in such plan, in accordance with the regulations prescribed by the State Fire Marshal. If at any time the State Fire Marshal finds that such plan is inadequate to achieve safe operation, he shall, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, require such plan to be revised. The plan required by the State Fire Marshal shall be practicable and designed to meet the need for pipeline safety. In determining the adequacy of any such plan, the State Fire Marshal shall consider:

(1) Relevant available pipeline safety data;

(2) Whether the plan is appropriate for the particular type of pipeline transportation;

(3) The reasonableness of the plan; and

(4) The extent to which such plan will contribute to public safety.

Laws 1969, c. 763, § 7, p. 2888.